el: Συστατικό βάσης χούμους: Παντζάρι; Μαύρα φασόλια; Κουνουπίδι; Ρεβίθια; Φασόλια ενταμάμε; Φακές; Αρακάς; Γλυκοπατάτα; Λευκά φασόλια; Άλλο
fi: Hummuksen pääainesosa: Punajuuri; Mustapavut; Kukkakaali; Kikherneet; Edamame; Linssit; Herneet; Bataatti; Valkoiset pavut; Muu
ro-RO: Ingredientul de bază pentru humus: Sfeclă; Fasole neagră; Conopidă; Năut; Edamame; Linte; Mazăre; Cartof dulce; Fasole albă; Altele
zh-TW: 鷹嘴豆泥基底食材: 甜菜根; 黑豆; 白花椰菜; 鷹嘴豆; 毛豆; 小扁豆; 豌豆; 地瓜; 白豆; 其他
da: Hovedingrediens i hummus: Rødbede; Sorte bønner; Blomkål; Kikærter; Edamame; Linser; Ærter; Sød kartoffel; Hvide bønner; Andet
th: ส่วนผสมหลักของฮัมมัส: บีท; ถั่วดำ; กะหล่ำดอก; ถั่วลูกไก่; ถั่วแระญี่ปุ่น; ถั่วเลนทิล; ถั่วลันเตา; มันเทศ; ถั่วขาว; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Osnovna sestavina humusa: Pesa; Črni fižol; Cvetača; Čičerika; Edamame; Leča; Grah; Sladki krompir; Beli fižol; Drugo
sk-SK: Základná ingrediencia pre hummus: Cvikla; Čierna fazuľa; Karfiol; Cícer; Edamame; Šošovica; Hrach; Batat; Biela fazuľa; Iné
de: Basiszutat des Hummus: Rote Bete; Schwarze Bohnen; Blumenkohl; Kichererbsen; Edamame; Linsen; Erbsen; Süßkartoffel; Weiße Bohnen; Sonstiges
ja: フムスのベース素材: ビーツ; 黒豆; カリフラワー; ひよこ豆; 枝豆; レンズ豆; エンドウ豆; サツマイモ; 白インゲン豆; その他
pt-PT: Ingrediente base do hummus: Beterraba; Feijão-preto; Couve-flor; Grão-de-bico; Edamame; Lentilhas; Ervilhas; Batata-doce; Feijão-branco; Outro
sv: Basingrediens för hummus: Rödbeta; Svarta bönor; Blomkål; Kikärtor; Edamamebönor; Linser; Ärtor; Sötpotatis; Vita bönor; Övrigt
zh-CN: 鹰嘴豆泥基底原料: 甜菜根; 黑豆; 花椰菜; 鹰嘴豆; 毛豆; 小扁豆; 豌豆; 红薯; 白芸豆; 其他
hr-HR: Sastojak za bazu humusa: Cikla; Crni grah; Cvjetača; Slanutak; Edamame; Leća; Grašak; Batat; Bijeli grah; Ostalo
nl: Hummus basis ingrediënt: Biet; Zwarte bonen; Bloemkool; Kikkererwten; Edamame; Linzen; Erwten; Zoete aardappel; Witte bonen; Overig
pt-BR: Hummus ingrediente base: Beterraba; Feijão-preto; Couve-flor; Grão-de-bico; Edamame; Lentilha; Ervilha; Batata-doce; Feijão-branco; Outro
pl: Składnik bazowy hummusu: Burak; Czarna fasola; Kalafior; Ciecierzyca; Edamame; Soczewica; Groszek; Batat; Biała fasola; Inne
ru: Базовый ингредиент хумуса: Свекла; Черная фасоль; Цветная капуста; Нут; Эдамаме; Чечевица; Горох; Батат; Белая фасоль; Другое
tr: Humusun ana malzemesi: Pancar; Siyah fasulye; Karnabahar; Nohut; Edamame; Mercimek; Bezelye; Tatlı patates; Beyaz fasulye; Diğer
fr: Ingrédient de base du houmous: Betterave; Haricots noirs; Chou-fleur; Pois chiches; Édamames; Lentilles; Petits pois; Patate douce; Haricots blancs; Autre
ko: 후무스 기본 재료: 비트; 검은콩; 콜리플라워; 병아리콩; 에다마메; 렌틸콩; 완두콩; 고구마; 흰강낭콩; 기타
bg-BG: Основна съставка на хумуса: Цвекло; Черен боб; Карфиол; Нахут; Едамаме; Леща; Грах; Сладък картоф; Бял боб; Друго
cs: Základní ingredience hummusu: Řepa; Černé fazole; Květák; Cizrna; Edamame; Čočka; Hrách; Batát; Bílé fazole; Ostatní
it: Ingrediente base dell'hummus: Barbabietola; Fagioli neri; Cavolfiore; Ceci; Edamame; Lenticchie; Piselli; Patata dolce; Fagioli cannellini; Altro
hu: Hummusz alapvető összetevője: Cékla; Fekete bab; Karfiol; Csicseriborsó; Edamame; Lencse; Borsó; Édesburgonya; Fehér bab; Egyéb
lt-LT: Humuso bazinis ingredientas: Burokėliai; Juodosios pupelės; Žiediniai kopūstai; Avinžirniai; Edamame pupelės; Lęšiai; Žirniai; Saldžiosios bulvės; Baltosios pupelės; Kita
vi: Thành phần cơ bản của hummus: Củ dền; Đậu đen; Súp lơ trắng; Đậu gà; Đậu edamame; Đậu lăng; Đậu Hà Lan; Khoai lang; Đậu trắng; Khác
en: Hummus base ingredient: Beet; Black beans; Cauliflower; Chickpeas; Edamame; Lentils; Peas; Sweet potato; White beans; Other
nb: Ingrediens i hummusbasis: Rødbete; Svarte bønner; Blomkål; Kikerter; Edamame; Linser; Erter; Søtpotet; Hvite bønner; Annet
es: Ingrediente base del hummus: Remolacha; Frijoles negros; Coliflor; Garbanzos; Edamame; Lentejas; Guisantes; Batata; Frijoles blancos; Otro